Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 1 REGISTRATION AND TAXATION
(25) (a) (I) Except as provided in subsection (25)(b) of this section, the department shall allow a credit for taxes, surcharges, and registration fees paid on any item of Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, or Class F personal property if the owner disposes of the vehicle during the registration period or if the owner converts the vehicle from any class of personal property to Class F property. The credit may apply to payments of taxes, surcharges, and registration fees on a subsequent application by the owner for registration of an item of Class A, Class B, Class C, Class D, or Class F personal property made during the registration period, or the credit may be assigned by the owner to the transferee of the property for which taxes, surcharges, or registration fees were paid; except that, when the transferee is a dealer in new or used vehicles, the transferee shall account to the owner for any assignment of the credit.

The credit authorized by this subsection (25)(a) is prorated based on the number of months remaining in the registration period after the transfer, conversion to Class F personal property, or disposal of the vehicle. The proration calculation for the credit begins with the first day of the month after the transfer, conversion to Class F personal property, or disposal and ends the last day of the month for which the vehicle was registered.

The credit is allowed only if the total ownership tax, surcharge, and registration fee credit due exceeds ten dollars.

The credit authorized in subsection (25)(a) of this section does not apply to fees imposed in sections 42-3-301; 42-3-304 (5), (6), (7), (19), and (22); 42-3-312; and 42-3-313.

Notwithstanding the amount specified for the fees in paragraph (e) of subsection (11) and paragraph (b) of subsection (16) of this section, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may reduce the amount of one or more of the fees if necessary pursuant to section 24-75-402 (3), C.R.S., to reduce the uncommitted reserves of the fund to which all or any portion of one or more of the fees is credited. After the uncommitted reserves of the fund are sufficiently reduced, the executive director of the department by rule or as otherwise provided by law may increase the amount of one or more of the fees as provided in section 24-75-402 (4), C.R.S.

Notwithstanding any provision in this article to the contrary, a fleet owner may process the registration renewal for any fleet vehicle, with the exception of Class A personal property, in the county in which the fleet owner's principal office or principal fleet management facility is located instead of in the county in which the fleet vehicle is located at the time of registration. A fleet vehicle for which the registration renewal is processed pursuant to this subsection (27) shall continue to be registered in the county in which it is located at the time of registration. This subsection (27) shall not apply to a fleet vehicle that was not previously registered in Colorado at the time of registration.

If a fleet owner chooses to process the registration renewal of a fleet vehicle in the county in which the owner's principal office or principal fleet management facility is located instead of in the county in which the vehicle is located, the authorized agent in the county where the owner's principal office or principal fleet management facility is located shall collect the registration fee and specific ownership tax payable on each fleet vehicle for which the registration renewal is processed by the fleet owner in such county.

The authorized agent in a county in which a fleet vehicle registration renewal is processed pursuant to this section shall retain and not disburse the sum authorized pursuant to section 42-1-210 (1)(a) to defray the costs associated with vehicle registration. The authorized agent in the county in which a fleet vehicle registration renewal is processed pursuant to this section shall transmit to the department all fees and moneys collected by the agent pursuant to section 42-1-214.

The authorized agent in the county in which a fleet vehicle registration renewal is processed pursuant to this section shall transmit the registration fees collected pursuant to section 42-3-310 to the department. The department shall then transmit such fees to the authorized agent in the county in which the fleet vehicle is located at the time of registration, and the authorized agent shall transmit such fees to the county treasurer pursuant to section 42-3-310.

The annual specific ownership tax on each fleet vehicle for which the registration renewal is processed in the county in which the fleet owner's principal office or principal fleet management facility is located shall become due and payable to the authorized agent in such county pursuant to this article. The authorized agent in such county shall apportion the specific ownership taxes collected for all fleet vehicles for which the registration renewal is processed in such county pursuant to this subsection (27) to the counties in which the fleet vehicles are located at the time of registration in proportion to the number of fleet vehicles located in each county.

This subsection (27) applies to registration renewal for fleet vehicles.

Repealed.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to affect the allocation of highway users tax fund moneys to counties or municipalities pursuant to sections 43-4-207 and 43-4-208, C.R.S.

The prepaid annual specific ownership tax for a registration issued under section 42-3-102 (4) is ninety-five dollars and fifty cents.

Year of service

Rate of tax

First year
2.10% of taxable value
Second year
1.50% of taxable value
Third year
1.20% of taxable value
Fourth year
.90% of taxable value
Fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth,
and ninth years
.45% of taxable value or $10,
whichever is greater
Tenth and each later year
$ 3

Year of service

Rate of tax

First year
2.10% of taxable value
Second year
1.50% of taxable value
Third year
1.20% of taxable value
Fourth year
.90% of taxable value
Fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth,
and ninth years
.45% of taxable value or $10,
whichever is greater
Tenth and each later year
$ 3

Year of service

Rate of tax

First year
2.10% of taxable value
Second year
1.50% of taxable value
Third year
1.20% of taxable value
Fourth year
.90% of taxable value
Fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth,
and ninth years
.45% of taxable value
Tenth and each later year
$ 3

Year of service

Rate of tax

First year
2.10% of taxable value
Second year
1.50% of taxable value
Third year
1.20% of taxable value
Fourth year
.90% of taxable value
Fifth, sixth, seventh, eighth,
and ninth years
.45% of taxable value
Tenth and each later year
.45% of taxable value or $ 3,
whichever is greater

Year of service

Rate of tax

First year
2.10% of taxable value
Second year
1.50% of taxable value
Third year
1.25% of taxable value
Fourth year
1.00% of taxable value
Fifth year
.75% of taxable value
Sixth and each later year
.50% of taxable value,
but not less than $ 5

Source:

L. 2005:

Entire article amended with relocations, p. 1080, § 2, effective August 8.

L. 2006:

(11)(a) and (12)(a) amended, p. 975, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2008:

(1)(a)(I) amended, p. 810, § 2, effective September 1.

L. 2010:

(16)(a), IP(16)(b), (16)(e), (17)(b), (18)(b), and (25) amended, (HB 10-1172), ch. 320, p. 1489, § 6, effective October 1.

L. 2011:

(16)(c) and (17)(e)(II) amended, (HB 11-1093), ch. 258, p. 1132, § 2, effective June 2; (27)(f)(II) repealed, (HB 11-1303), ch. 264, p. 1181, § 106, effective August 10.

L. 2012:

(28) added, (HB 12-1038), ch. 276, p. 1456, § 3, effective June 8.

L. 2012, 1st Ex. Sess.:

(16)(f) added, (SB 12S-001), ch. 3, p. 2433, § 1, effective August 15.

L. 2013:

(16)(c) and (16)(d) amended, (HB 13-1153), ch. 199, p. 810, § 1, effective August 7.

L. 2014:

(1)(a)(I) amended and (1)(a)(I.5) added, (HB 14-1326), ch. 357, p. 1679, § 6, effective June 6; (8) and (10) amended, (SB 14-075), ch. 264, p. 1058, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2017:

(15)(f) and (27)(f)(I) amended, (HB 17-1107), ch. 101, p. 367, § 12, effective August 9.

L. 2019:

(25) amended, (HB 19-1138), ch. 231, p. 2318, § 1, effective January 1, 2020.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2012 act adding subsection (28), see section 1 of chapter 276, Session Laws of Colorado 2012. For the legislative declaration in HB 14-1326, see section 1 of chapter 357, Session Laws of Colorado 2014.